Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.646

Registration with the secretary of state.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited partnership shall register with the secretary of state in accordance with Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6121; 2009 c 188 s 902.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.